Illinois, session 104th, SB838.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Operating Standards Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 45/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Open 8Operating Standards Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-627, eff. 3-7-14.)